Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 11 Records and Reports of Currency Transactions

7-1-910.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this article to require certain reports and records of transactions involving United States currency where such reports and records have a high degree of usefulness in criminal, tax, or regulatory investigations or proceedings.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-910

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2219, § 1.

7-1-911.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of banking and finance.

“Conducts” includes initiating, concluding, or participating in initiating or concluding a transaction.

“Currency” means currency and coin of the United States.

“Currency transaction” means a transaction:

Initiated from the receipt or payment of currency or concluding with the receipt or payment of currency; or

Involving the movement or transfer of monetary value by electronic means other than within the books of account of the same financial institution.

“Department” means the Department of Banking and Finance of the State of Georgia.

“Financial institution” means:

A state or national bank;

A trust company;

A state savings and loan association or a federal savings and loan association;

A state or federal credit union;

An international bank agency doing business in this state on April 1, 1975, pursuant to the former “International Bank Agency Act,” approved April 6, 1972 (Ga. L. 1972, p. 1140), or authorized to do business in this state pursuant to Article 5 of this chapter; or

A licensee under Article 4 or Article 4A of this chapter and such other persons as may be engaged in the business of:

Cashing payment instruments for a fee; or

Performing transactions by wire or other electronic means to facilitate the movement or transfer of money.

“Knowing that the moneys involved in a currency transaction represent the proceeds of some form of unlawful activity” means that the person knew the moneys involved in the transaction represented proceeds from some form, although not necessarily which form, of activity that constitutes a felony under this Code.

“Monetary instruments” means coin or currency of the United States or of any other country, travelers’ checks, personal checks, bank checks, money orders, investment securities in bearer form or otherwise in such form that title thereto passes upon delivery, and negotiable instruments in bearer form or otherwise in such form that title thereto passes upon delivery.

“Person” means natural persons, partnerships, trusts, estates, associations, corporations, and all entities cognizable as legal personalities.

“Specified unlawful activity” means any act or activity constituting an offense punishable as a felony pursuant to the laws of this state or any act or acts constituting a pattern of racketeering activity as that term is defined in Code Section 16-14-3.

“Transaction” includes:

A purchase, sale, loan, pledge, gift, transfer, delivery, or other disposition and, with respect to a financial institution, includes a deposit, withdrawal, transfer between accounts, exchange of currency, loan, extension of credit, purchase or sale of any stock, bond, certificate of deposit, or other monetary instrument, or any other payment, transfer, or delivery by, through, or to a financial institution, by whatever means effected; or

The movement of funds by wire or other means or involving one or more monetary instruments or the use of a financial institution.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-911

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2219, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 214, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 17; Ga. L. 1990, p. 362, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 458, § 9; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-22/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 7/HB 323.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, a comma was deleted following “disposition” and commas were inserted preceding and following “with respect to a financial institution” in subparagraph (10)(A) (now subparagraph (11)(A)).

Editor’s notes.

The “International Bank Agency Act” (Ga. L. 1972, p. 1140), referred to in subparagraph (6)(E), was repealed by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 3.

Law reviews.

For note on 1990 amendment of this Code section, see 7 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 201 (1990).

7-1-912.
Records and reports of certain currency transactions; regulations; commissioner’s authority under Code Section 7-1-64; prohibited acts; definitions.

Financial institutions and other money service businesses are required by state law to comply with the filing, reporting, and record-keeping requirements provided for in federal law. The department may promulgate regulations that specify additional requirements for currency transaction reports, record keeping, and suspicious activity reports.

Pursuant to federal law, a financial institution must keep a record of any currency transaction deemed suspicious for any reason, including transactions where money laundering is suspected, and file a report of such transaction with the appropriate federal authority. All such suspicious activity reports shall be simultaneously filed with the department, unless by regulation the department deems a federal filing to be adequate.

The provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply to transfers between banks, credit unions, or savings and loan associations chartered under the laws of any state or the United States which do not involve the payment or receipt of currency and which are accomplished through a wire or electronic transfer system operated by the Federal Reserve System, the Federal Home Loan Bank System, or other governmental agency or instrumentality; provided, however, with regard to each such transfer the bank, credit union, or savings and loan association shall maintain a record of the name, address, and tax identification number of its customer, the name and location of the corresponding bank, credit union, or savings and loan association, and the name of the customer of the corresponding bank, credit union, or savings and loan association.

The commissioner shall prescribe such regulations as he may deem appropriate to carry out the purposes of this article. Such regulations shall to the extent feasible be consistent with federal regulations and may provide for exemption of such transactions as the commissioner determines are clearly of a legitimate nature for which mandatory reporting would serve no useful purpose. The regulations shall provide for adequate safeguards against unauthorized currency transactions or transactions otherwise inconsistent with this article.

The commissioner in his discretion may exercise the authority granted in Code Section 7-1-64 to assure that financial institutions subject to this article are in compliance herewith.

No person shall for the purpose of evading the reporting requirements of this Code section:

Cause or attempt to cause a financial institution to fail to file a report required pursuant to this Code section;

Cause or attempt to cause a financial institution to file a report required pursuant to this Code section that contains a material omission or misstatement of fact; or

Structure or assist in structuring or attempt to structure or assist in structuring any currency transaction with one or more financial institutions.

For purposes of this Code section, the term:

“Material omission or misstatement” shall include the furnishing of a false or erroneous name, address, taxpayer identification number, and business, profession, or occupation for the person performing the currency transaction or the beneficiary of such transaction or displaying or otherwise producing physical proof of identity on such persons which is forged, falsified, or otherwise altered; and

“Structuring” of a currency transaction means the division of a transaction which would otherwise be reportable under this Code section into two or more transactions which if considered separately would not be reportable.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-912

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2219, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 214, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 18; Ga. L. 1990, p. 362, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 917, § 9; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1780, § 6; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 12; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 28; Ga. L. 2004, p. 458, § 10.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, a comma was inserted following “federal law” in the first sentence of paragraph (a)(2).

Law reviews.

For note on 1990 amendment of this Code section, see 7 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 201 (1990).

7-1-913.
Access to reports.

The Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Department of Revenue shall have access to and shall be authorized to inspect and copy any reports filed with the department pursuant to this article.
In addition, unless prohibited by federal law or by any agreements with federal authorities, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Department of Revenue shall have access to and shall be authorized to inspect and copy any currency transaction report information received by the department from federal authorities.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-913

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2219, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1780, § 7.

7-1-914.
Civil penalties; action for recovery.

For each willful violation of this article, the commissioner may assess upon any financial institution and upon any director, officer, or employee thereof who willfully participates in the violation a civil penalty not exceeding $1,000.00.

In the event of the failure of any person to pay any penalty assessed under this Code section, a civil action for recovery thereof may, in the discretion of the commissioner, be brought in the name of the State of Georgia.

Whoever conducts or attempts to conduct a transaction described in subsection (c) of Code Section 7-1-915 is liable to the State of Georgia for a civil penalty of not more than the amount of the funds involved in the transaction or $10,000.00, whichever is greater.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-914

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2219, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 19.

7-1-915.
Criminal penalties; penalties imposed by other Code sections not superseded.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, whoever willfully violates any provision of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Whoever willfully violates any provision of this article where the violation is:

Committed in furtherance of the commission of any other violation of Georgia law; or

Committed as part of a pattern of illegal activity involving transactions exceeding $100,000.00 in any 12 month period

shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than $500,000.00 or by imprisonment for not more than five years, or both.

Whoever, knowing that the moneys involved in a currency transaction represent the proceeds of some form of unlawful activity, conducts or attempts to conduct such a transaction which in fact involves the proceeds of specified unlawful activity:

With the intent to promote the carrying on of specified unlawful activity; or

Knowing that the transaction is designed in whole or in part to conceal or disguise the nature, the location, the source, the ownership, or the control of the proceeds of specified unlawful activity; or to avoid a transaction reporting requirement under this article

shall be sentenced to a fine of not more than $500,000.00 or twice the amount involved in the transaction, whichever is greater, or imprisonment for not more than 20 years, or both.

Nothing in subsection (c) of this Code section nor in subsection (c) of Code Section 7-1-914 shall supersede any provision of law imposing criminal or civil penalties or affording civil remedies in addition to those provided for in this Code section or in Code Section 7-1-914.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-915

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2219, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 5; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 20.

7-1-916.
Forfeiture of property involved in illegal transactions.

All property of every kind used or intended for use in the course of, derived from, or realized through a transaction which in fact involves the proceeds of unlawful activity specified in Chapter 14 of Title 16 or otherwise subject to the provisions of this article shall be subject to forfeiture to the state. Forfeiture shall be had by the same procedure as is set forth in Chapter 16 of Title 9. As used in this Code section, the terms “proceeds” and “property” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 9-16-2.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-916

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 21; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-6/HB 233.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).